Maine, session 132, LD914.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §242, first ¶, as amended by PL 2013, c. 16, §2, is further amended
to read:
The Office of the State Auditor must be organized in the manner the State Auditor
considers best suited to the accomplishment of its functions. The office may have those
auditors, assistants and employees as the State Auditor may require, classified, titled and
compensated as the State Auditor considers appropriate, but they are subject to the Civil
Service Law.